Washington statutes.
RCW 19.80.001

Purposes.

The purposes of this chapter are: (1) To require each person who is conducting business in the state of Washington under a trade name to disclose the true and real name of each person conducting that business, and (2) to provide a central registry of businesses operating under a trade name in the state of Washington.

[ 1984 c 130 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1984 c 130: "Sections 1 through 11 of this act shall take effect on October 1, 1984. The director of licensing is authorized to immediately take such steps as are necessary to insure that this act is implemented on its effective date." [ 1984 c 130 s 12.]